src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_SUÅPPÂD !!= * @CODE@ suåppâd:suåpp

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1[231].2 (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' is for verbs like
! * Yaml: __V-huollad__
!  with lexc stem
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: suåppâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! +Der/mõš

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: suäpp
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: suäʹpˈpe
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: sueʹpˈpe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: suåvâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der/ted

+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CC2C%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: suävas
!! Imprt+Sg3

:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: suåpˈpu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^CC2CCC%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: suäpˈpaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

+Der/škueʹtted:%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: suåv»
+Der/ted:%^CC2C»ât  V_AALǤTED ;


LEXICON V_AIBBÂD !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
+V: V0_AIBBÂD ;
LEXICON IV_AIBBÂD !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
+V+IV: V0_AIBBÂD ;
LEXICON TV_AIBBÂD !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
+V+TV: V0_AIBBÂD ;
LEXICON V0_AIBBÂD !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[221] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: aibbâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: äibb
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: äiʹbbe
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: aiʹbbe
! (5)  Imprt.Sg2: aaib
! (6)  Pot.Sg3: aaibâž
! (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ääibas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: aibbu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: äibbaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: aib»
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !! (1)  Inf: aibbâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! +Der/mõš

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: äibb
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: äiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: aiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: aaibâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der/ted

+Imprt+Sg3:%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ääibas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: aibbu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: aib»


LEXICON V_TOBDDÂD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:tobdd
+V: V0_TOBDDÂD ;
LEXICON IV_TOBDDÂD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:tobdd
+V+IV: V0_TOBDDÂD ;
LEXICON TV_TOBDDÂD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:tobdd
+V+TV: V0_TOBDDÂD ;
LEXICON V0_TOBDDÂD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:tobdd

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[221] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: tobddâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! +Der/mõš

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: tåbdd
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: tåʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: toʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: toobdâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der/ted

+Imprt+Sg3:%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: tååbdas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: tobddu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: tobd»

LEXICON V_KUÕSKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
+V: V0_KUÕSKKÂD ;
LEXICON IV_KUÕSKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
+V+IV: V0_KUÕSKKÂD ;
LEXICON TV_KUÕSKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
+V+TV: V0_KUÕSKKÂD ;
