src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
aiccâd:aicc V_AIBBÂD ;
auddâd:audd V_AIBBÂD ;
aukkâd:aukk V_AIBBÂD ;
breuggâd:breugg V_AIBBÂD ;
caummâd:caumm V_AIBBÂD ;
counnâd:counn V_AIBBÂD ;
couŋŋâd:couŋŋ V_AIBBÂD ;
cuckkâd:cuckk V_TOBDDÂD ;
doiddâd:doidd V_AIBBÂD ;
halssâd:halss V_TOBDDÂD ;
hauddâd:haudd V_AIBBÂD ;
haukkâd:haukk V_AIBBÂD ;
iiŋŋâd:iiŋŋ V_AIBBÂD ;
išttâd:ištt V_TOBDDÂD ;
jaukkâd:jaukk V_AIBBÂD ;
jouddâd:joudd V_AIBBÂD ;
jõskkâd:jõskk V_TOBDDÂD ;
kalggâd:kalgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
kalvvâd:kalvv V_TOBDDÂD ;
kanggâd:kangg V_TOBDDÂD ;
karbbâd:karbb V_TOBDDÂD ;
karssâd:karss V_TOBDDÂD ;
kasttâd:kastt V_TOBDDÂD ;
kaullâd:kaull V_AIBBÂD ;
kaunnâd:kaunn V_AIBBÂD ;
kolggâd:kolgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
kopččâd:kopčč V_TOBDDÂD ;
kouddâd:koudd V_AIBBÂD ;
koškkâd:koškk V_TOBDDÂD ;
kramppâd:krampp V_TOBDDÂD ;
kraŋkkâd:kraŋkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
kuivvâd:kuivv V_AIBBÂD ;
kuårkkâd:kuårkk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
kuårssâd:kuårss V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
kuåsttâd:kuåstt V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
kuõrkkâd:kuõrkk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
kuõskkâd:kuõskk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
kõbddâd:kõbdd V_TOBDDÂD ;
kõckkâd:kõckk V_TOBDDÂD ;
kõinnâd:kõinn V_AIBBÂD ;
kõlppâd:kõlpp V_TOBDDÂD ;
kõskkâd:kõskk V_TOBDDÂD ;
kõškkâd:kõškk V_TOBDDÂD ;
lahttâd:lahtt V_TOBDDÂD ;
lauggâd:laugg V_AIBBÂD ;
liõhttâd:liõhtt V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
loškkâd:loškk V_TOBDDÂD ;
lõbttâd:lõbtt V_TOBDDÂD ;
lõhttâd:lõhtt V_TOBDDÂD ;
malttâd:maltt V_TOBDDÂD ;
miâsttâd:miâstt V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
mourrâd:mourr V_AIBBÂD ;
mõsttâd:mõstt V_TOBDDÂD ;
naullâd:naull V_AIBBÂD ;
njaukkâd:njaukk V_AIBBÂD ;
njuõrddâd:njuõrdd V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
njuõrggâd:njuõrgg V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
njõrttâd:njõrtt V_TOBDDÂD ;
norddâd:nordd V_TOBDDÂD ;
notkkâd:notkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
oiggâd:oigg V_AIBBÂD ;
oikkâd:oikk V_AIBBÂD ;
palggâd:palgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
palvvâd:palvv V_TOBDDÂD ;
polččâd:polčč V_TOBDDÂD ;
porggâd:porgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
poskkâd:poskk V_TOBDDÂD ;
puhččâd:puhčč V_TOBDDÂD ;
puåtkkâd:puåtkk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
põrggâd:põrgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
rainnâd:rainn V_AIBBÂD ;
raukkâd:raukk V_AIBBÂD ;
ripssâd:ripss V_TOBDDÂD ;
risttâd:ristt V_TOBDDÂD ;
rouggâd:rougg V_AIBBÂD ;
ruõsttâd:ruõstt V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
salbbâd:salbb V_TOBDDÂD ;
salkkâd:salkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
saukkâd:saukk V_AIBBÂD ;
siâlggâd:siâlgg V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
skorkkâd:skorkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
skõrkkâd:skõrkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
snorkkâd:snorkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
solggâd:solgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
sopttâd:soptt V_TOBDDÂD ;
sporttâd:sportt V_TOBDDÂD ;
suõskkâd:suõskk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
suõsttâd:suõstt V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
sõhttâd:sõhtt V_TOBDDÂD ;
sõlkkâd:sõlkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
sǩiâŋkkâd:sǩiâŋkk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
tanccâd:tancc V_TOBDDÂD ;
tiuddâd:tiudd V_AIBBÂD ;
tobddâd:tobdd V_TOBDDÂD ;
tolkkâd:tolkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
torkkâd:torkk V_TOBDDÂD ;
turccâd:turcc V_TOBDDÂD ;
tuõlddâd:tuõldd V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
tuõlmmâd:tuõlmm V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
tuõrvvâd:tuõrvv V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
tuõsttâd:tuõstt V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
tuõšmmâd:tuõšmm V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
tuškkâd:tuškk V_TOBDDÂD ;
tõrggâd:tõrgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
uiddâd:uidd V_AIBBÂD ;
urččâd:určč V_TOBDDÂD ;
vackkâd:vackk V_TOBDDÂD ;
valvvâd:valvv V_TOBDDÂD ;
veâullâd:veâull V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
viârmmâd:viârmm V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
viõhssâd:viõhss V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
vuõrjjâd:vuõrjj V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
võckkâd:võckk V_TOBDDÂD ;
võuddâd:võudd V_AIBBÂD ;
õhttâd:õhtt V_TOBDDÂD ;
õlggâd:õlgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
õsttâd:õstt V_TOBDDÂD ;
čackkâd:čackk V_TOBDDÂD ;
čiõckkâd:čiõckk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
čiõhttâd:čiõhtt V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
čiõhččâd:čiõhčč V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
čiõlggâd:čiõlgg V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
čolggâd:čolgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
čornnâd:čornn V_TOBDDÂD ;
čouggâd:čougg V_AIBBÂD ;
čuõlmmâd:čuõlmm V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
čõlggâd:čõlgg V_TOBDDÂD ;
šliâpššâd:šliâpšš V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
šlomppâd:šlompp V_TOBDDÂD ;
šoukkâd:šoukk V_AIBBÂD ;
šošnnâd:šošnn V_TOBDDÂD ;
šuåtkkâd:šuåtkk V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
ǩiõrddâd:ǩiõrdd V_KUÕSKKÂD ;
